Hawaii statutes.
[PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS]

Note

Sections 661-1 to 661-12 designated as Part I pursuant to
§23G-15.

§661-1 Jurisdiction. The several
circuit courts of the State and, except as otherwise provided by statute or
rule, the several state district courts, subject to appeal as provided by law, shall
have original jurisdiction to hear and determine the following matters, and,
unless otherwise provided by law, shall determine all questions of fact
involved without the intervention of a jury:

(1) All claims against the State founded upon any
statute of the State; upon any rule of an executive department; or upon any
contract, expressed or implied, with the State, and all claims which may be
referred to any such court by the legislature; provided that no action shall be
maintained, nor shall any process issue against the State, based on any
contract or any act of any state officer that the officer is not authorized to
make or do by the laws of the State, nor upon any other cause of action than as
herein set forth; and

(2) All counterclaims, whether liquidated or
unliquidated, or other demands whatsoever on the part of the State against any
person making claim against the State under this part. [L 1894-5, c 26, §1; RL
1925, §2669; am L 1929, c 213, §1; RL 1935, §4420; RL 1945, §10475; RL 1955,
§245-1; HRS §661-1; am L 1972, c 164, §1(a); am L 1978, c 156, §1; am L 1979, c
152, §1; am L 1984, c 135, §2; am L 2016, c 55, §41]

Cross References

Costs, bond, when State a party, see §607-24.

Money paid under protest, suit to recover, see §40-35.

Rules of Court

Counterclaim, see HRCP rule 13.

Costs, bond, when State a party, see HRCP rules 54(d), 62(e).

Case Notes

A suit to restrain unconstitutional act of state officer is
not suit against the State. 402 F. Supp. 95 (1975).

No defense of sovereign immunity, including Eleventh
Amendment, can be raised as to actions under this chapter if the applicable
consent section is §661-11. 512 F. Supp. 889 (1981).

This section and §662-2 did not constitute a waiver of
defendants' Eleventh Amendment immunity where plaintiffs contended that
defendants' failure to provide sufficient Hawaiian language in Hawaii's public
schools violated state and federal laws. 951 F. Supp. 1484 (1996).

Nothing in the language of this section and §662-3 suggests
that Hawaii intended to subject itself to suit in federal court. 950 F. Supp.
2d 1159 (2013).

Public officer making government contracts, not personally
liable. 2 H. 433 (1861); 5 H. 383 (1885).

Suit by way of mandamus against state officer to do what a
statute requires of officer is not a suit against the State. 7 H. 470 (1888).
Suit against Commissioner of Public Lands to rescind lease made with another
not suit against the State. 40 H. 675, 686 (1955). Suit for recovery of money
illegally exacted and already paid over is suit against State. 11 H. 10 (1897).
See §40-35.

Where salary has been paid to de facto officer acting under
color of title, de jure officer cannot recover from government salary of office
while he was out of same. 9 H. 311 (1893).

Hawaiian government not liable for conversion of private fund
by one of its employees acting outside scope of his official duties. 10 H. 607
(1897).

Government consenting to be sued may do so upon such terms and
conditions as it pleases. 11 H. 10 (1897).

Statute not unconstitutional on ground that jury is denied.
11 H. 10 (1897). Nor on ground that it is retrospective. 11 H. 404 (1898).
See 11 H. 566 (1898); 13 H. 465 (1901); 17 H. 285 (1906), rev'd 206 U.S. 206
(1907).

State not liable for injuries from defective streets. 13 H.
478 (1901) (prior to enactment of chapter 662). Ejectment does not lie against
government. 13 H. 1 (1900). Partition does not lie when State claims absolute
title. 48 H. 92, 395 P.2d 620 (1964). State cannot be made party to suit to
foreclose mortgage. 17 H. 82 (1905), aff'd 205 U.S. 349 (1907). State not
liable for extras except in accordance with contract. 16 H. 711 (1905). See
27 H. 792 (1924).

Waiver by statute. 33 H. 379 (1935); 33 H. 409 (1935); 34 H.
213 (1937).

Implied contract. 36 H. 75 (1942); 43 H. 28 (1958) (prior to
enactment of chapter 662).

Suit against government agency in private capacity as
trustee. 37 H. 8 (1944).

Claim under §101-27 may not be made subject of collateral
suit against State under this section. 49 H. 365, 369-370, 418 P.2d 482 (1966).

Proceeding against property in which State has an interest is
suit against State and cannot be maintained without consent of State. 50 H.
207, 436 P.2d 527 (1968); 49 H. 365, 418 P.2d 482 (1966); 51 H. 87, 451 P.2d
809 (1969).

Implied contract for State to pay taxpayer earnings on
protested, paid tax. 56 H. 655, 547 P.2d 581 (1976).

Sovereign immunity held to preclude suit against State based
on chapter 480. 60 H. 228, 588 P.2d 430 (1978).

Where plaintiffs seek injunction for unconstitutional acts
and damages, sovereign immunity bars suit. 68 H. 192, 708 P.2d 129 (1985),
cert. denied, 476 U.S. 1169 (1986).

An order denying a pretrial motion based on sovereign
immunity is not a final judgment, therefore, not appealable. 71 H. 519, 795
P.2d 283 (1990).

Further waiver of sovereign immunity not necessary for
§607-14 to apply to the State and its agencies in matters in which, by virtue of
the express waiver of sovereign immunity set forth in this section, the State
has become a party. 87 H. 37, 951 P.2d 487 (1998).

Insofar as the State has not expressly and statutorily waived
its sovereign immunity from postjudgment interest in suits brought pursuant to
this section, the State is immune from awards of §478-3 postjudgment interest
in actions under this section; thus, the trial court erred in ordering that the
employees' retirement system pay statutory interest at the rate of ten per cent
per annum, pursuant to §478-3. 106 H. 416, 106 P.3d 339 (2005).

Where ocean recreation management area permit at issue was a
revocable license rather than a contract, this section was not a basis for
subject matter jurisdiction. 113 H. 184, 150 P.3d 833 (2006).

Where §343-7 waived the State's sovereign immunity against
actions brought to challenge: (1) the lack of an environmental assessment; (2)
the determination that an environmental impact statement is or is not required;
and (3) the acceptance of an environmental impact statement, sovereign immunity
did not prevent the application of the private attorney general doctrine
against the State and the circuit court did not err in relying on the doctrine
as a basis for its award of attorney's fees against the State and Superferry
jointly. 120 H. 181, 202 P.3d 1226 (2009).

Plaintiffs had to demonstrate a waiver of sovereign immunity
specifically over attorneys' fees because plaintiffs did not implicate this
section (case did not arise under this section) or any statutory waiver of
sovereign immunity; rather plaintiffs' case involved claims for declaratory and
injunctive relief based on alleged constitutional violations by defendant State
and state officials. 130 H. 162, 307 P.3d 142 (2013).

Does not confer jurisdiction on insurer actions to recover
moneys paid to the State without protest under §431-318. 5 H. App. 122, 678
P.2d 1104 (1984).

Suit authorized as one based on implied contract of warranty
of authority. 5 H. App. 616, 705 P.2d 72 (1985).

Suit to recover public assistance benefits wrongfully denied
is a claim against State founded upon any statute. 6 H. App. 160, 715 P.2d 813
(1986).

As the doctrine of primary jurisdiction applies to claims
against the employees' retirement system arising out of alleged miscalculation
of retirement contribution and benefits, while the circuit court had original
jurisdiction over the claim, the court did not abuse its discretion in staying,
rather than dismissing, the class action pending administrative review of
plaintiffs' individual claims. 121 H. 462 (App.), 220 P.3d 1043 (2009).

While the accrual and extent of an employee's benefits are
governed by the applicable statutory provisions of chapter 88, the duty of the
employees' retirement system to pay accrued benefits is deemed to be
contractual under article XVI, §2 of the Hawaii constitution; thus, a circuit
court's jurisdiction under paragraph (1) over such claims is "founded upon
contract", as well as statute and the circuit court did not err in
rejecting defendant's contention that plaintiffs' claims were barred by
sovereign immunity. 121 H. 462 (App.), 220 P.3d 1043 (2009).

As this section contains a limited waiver of sovereign
immunity for claims against the State that are founded upon a statute or
founded upon a contract with the State, the circuit court did not err when it
allowed plaintiff substitute teachers to pursue breach-of-contract claims
against the State where the teachers were in a contractual relationship with
the State, sought money that they claimed were due them for the work they
performed under the contract, and alleged that under the express and implied
terms of their agreement, they were entitled to pay in accordance with
§302A-624(e). 122 H. 150 (App.), 223 P.3d 215 (2009).

The State's sovereign immunity from plaintiff substitute
teachers' claims against the State was waived under this section and
§302A-624(e) where §302A-624(e) stated that the per diem salary for substitute
teachers "shall be" based on the formula that it described, and
§302A-624(e), as a pay-mandating statute, provided an alternative basis for
invoking the court's jurisdiction under the "founded upon any statute"
language in this section. 122 H. 150 (App.), 223 P.3d 215 (2009).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next